Maryland, session 2026, HB0373.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0373*

HOUSE BILL 373
Article – Health Occupations
4–205.
(a) In addition to the powers set forth elsewhere in this title, the Board may:
(6) On receipt of a written and signed complaint, including a referral from
the Commissioner of Labor and Industry, conduct an unannounced inspection of the office
of a dentist, other than an office of a dentist in a hospital, related institution, freestanding
medical facility, or a freestanding birthing center, to determine compliance at that office
with the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention’s guidelines on [universal]
STANDARD precautions AND THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND
PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES FOR INFECTION CONTROL IN DENTAL HEALTH–CARE
SETTINGS; and
4–315.
(a) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dentistry, a limited license to practice dentistry, or a
teacher’s license to practice dentistry to any applicant, reprimand any licensed dentist,
place any licensed dentist on probation, or suspend or revoke the license of any licensed
dentist, if the applicant or licensee:
(30) Except in an emergency life–threatening situation where it is not
feasible or practicable, fails to comply with the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s guidelines on [universal] STANDARD precautions OR THE CENTERS FOR
DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES FOR INFECTION CONTROL IN
DENTAL HEALTH–CARE SETTINGS;
(37) Accepts or tenders rebates or splits fees in violation of § 4–103(c) of this
title; [or]
(38) Allows a dental assistant to assist in the practice of dentistry:
(i) In an unauthorized manner in violation of this title or
regulations adopted by the Board;
(ii) Without specifically instructing the certified dental assistant to
perform an intraoral procedure that the certified dental assistant is authorized to perform;
or
(iii) Failing to provide direct supervision of a dental assistant; OR

HOUSE BILL 373 3
(39) EMPLOYS, SUPERVISES, OR USES THE SERVICES OF AN
INDIVIDUAL AS AN EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL ASSISTANT WHO IS NOT CERTIFIED
BY THE BOARD UNDER § 4–301.1 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(c) Subject to the hearing provisions of § 4–318 of this subtitle, the Board may
deny a general license to practice dental hygiene, a teacher’s license to practice dental
hygiene, or a temporary license to practice dental hygiene to any applicant, reprimand any
licensed dental hygienist, place any licensed dental hygienist on probation, or suspend or
revoke the license of any licensed dental hygienist, if the applicant or licensee:
(18) Except in an emergency life–threatening situation where it is not
feasible or practicable, fails to comply with the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention’s guidelines on [universal] STANDARD precautions OR THE CENTERS FOR
DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES FOR INFECTION CONTROL IN
DENTAL HEALTH–CARE SETTINGS;
(D) SUBJECT TO THE HEARING PROVISIONS OF § 4–318 OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE BOARD MAY DENY A CERTIFICATE TO PRACTICE EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL
ASSISTING TO ANY APPLICANT, REPRIMAND ANY CERTIFIED EXPANDED FUNCTION
DENTAL ASSISTANT, PLACE ANY CERTIFIED EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL
ASSISTANT ON PROBATION, OR SUSPEND OR REVOKE THE CERTIFICATE OF ANY
CERTIFIED EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL ASSISTANT, IF THE APPLICANT OR
CERTIFICATE HOLDER:
(1) PRACTICES EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL ASSISTING IN AN
INCOMPETENT MANNER;
(2) FAILS TO CONFORM TO GENERALLY ACCEPTED STANDARDS IN
THE PRACTICE OF EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL ASSISTING;
(3) PERFORMS INTRAORAL FUNCTIONS NOT AUTHORIZED BY
STATUTE OR THE RULES AND REGULATIONS OF THE BOARD;
(4) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY OBTAINS OR ATTEMPTS TO
OBTAIN A CERTIFICATE FOR THE APPLICANT OR FOR ANOTHER;
(5) FRAUDULENTLY OR DECEPTIVELY USES A CERTIFICATE;
(6) IS DISCIPLINED BY A LICENSING OR DISCIPLINARY AUTHORITY OF
ANY OTHER STATE OR COUNTRY OR CONVICTED OR DISCIPLINED BY A COURT OF ANY
STATE OR COUNTRY, OR DISCIPLINED BY ANY BRANCH OF THE UNIFORMED
SERVICES OR THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AFFAIRS FOR AN ACT THAT
WOULD BE GROUNDS FOR DISCIPLINARY ACTION UNDER THE BOARD’S
DISCIPLINARY STATUTES;

HOUSE BILL 373
(7) VIOLATES ANY RULE OR REGULATION ADOPTED BY THE BOARD;
(8) IS CONVICTED OF OR PLEADS GUILTY OR NOLO CONTENDERE TO
A FELONY OR A CRIME INVOLVING MORAL TURPITUDE, WHETHER OR NOT ANY
APPEAL OR OTHER PROCEEDING IS PENDING TO HAVE THE CONVICTION OR PLEA
SET ASIDE;
(9) PROVIDES PROFESSIONAL SERVICES WHILE UNDER THE
INFLUENCE OF ALCOHOL OR ANY CONTROLLED DANGEROUS SUBSTANCE OR DRUG
IN EXCESS OF THERAPEUTIC AMOUNTS;
(10) WILLFULLY MAKES OR FILES A FALSE REPORT OR RECORD OR
FAILS TO FILE A REPORT OR RECORD IN THE PRACTICE OF EXPANDED FUNCTION
DENTAL ASSISTING OR WILLFULLY INDUCES ANOTHER TO FILE A FALSE REPORT;
(11) REFUSES, WITHHOLDS FROM, DENIES, OR DISCRIMINATES
AGAINST AN INDIVIDUAL WITH REGARD TO THE PROVISION OF PROFESSIONAL
SERVICES THAT THE CERTIFIED INDIVIDUAL IS QUALIFIED TO RENDER BECAUSE
THE INDIVIDUAL IS HIV POSITIVE;
(12) EXCEPT IN AN EMERGENCY LIFE–THREATENING SITUATION
WHERE IT IS NOT FEASIBLE OR PRACTICABLE, FAILS TO COMPLY WITH THE CENTERS
FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S GUIDELINES ON STANDARD
PRECAUTIONS OR THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION’S
GUIDELINES FOR INFECTION CONTROL IN DENTAL HEALTH–CARE SETTINGS;
(13) FAILS TO COMPLY WITH A BOARD ORDER;
(14) IS MENTALLY OR PHYSICALLY INCOMPETENT TO PRACTICE
EXPANDED FUNCTION DENTAL ASSISTING;
(15) WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT LEGAL JUSTIFICATION FAILS TO
COOPERATE WITH A LAWFUL INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY THE BOARD;
(16) ENGAGES IN SEXUAL MISCONDUCT; OR
(17) BEHAVES DISHONORABLY OR UNPROFESSIONALLY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.